Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-326
Domestic company; disbursements; how made.

No domestic company shall make any disbursement of one hundred dollars or more other than policy proceeds or benefits unless the disbursement is evidenced by an invoice, a statement of account, or a voucher issued by or on behalf of the person, firm, or corporation receiving the money and correctly describing the consideration for the disbursement. If the invoice, statement of account, or voucher is unavailable, the disbursement shall be evidenced by an affidavit of some officer of the company identifying the disbursement and the consideration for the disbursement and stating the reason the invoice, statement of account, or voucher is unavailable.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 47, p. 418;

R.S.1913, § 3183;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 18, p. 597;

C.S.1922, § 7783;

C.S.1929, § 44-318;

R.S.1943, § 44-326;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 99.